Tennessee, session 114, SB0973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-2-213, is amended by deleting
"ten (10) business days" and substituting "fifteen (15) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0973
002680
- 1 -